Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-413
State, defined.

As used in sections 25-413 to 25-417, unless the context otherwise requires, state shall mean any foreign nation, and any state, district, commonwealth, territory or insular possession of the United States.

Laws 1969, c. 179, § 1, p. 769.